Maine, session 132, LD891.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4002, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 176, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Abuse or neglect. "Abuse or neglect" means a direct and identifiable threat to a
child's health or welfare by physical, mental or emotional injury or impairment, sexual
abuse or exploitation including under Title 17‑A, sections 282, 852, 853 and 855 or willful
deprivation of essential needs, or lack of protection from these, by a person responsible for
the child, for reasons other than poverty. "Abuse or neglect" also means truancy under
Title 20‑A, section 3272, subsection 2, paragraph C or section 5051‑A, subsection 1,
paragraph C or D when truancy is the result of neglect by a person responsible for the child.
"Abuse or neglect" also means a threat to a child's health or welfare caused by child sex
trafficking by any person, regardless of whether or not the person is responsible for the
child.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4002, sub-§1-B, ¶A-1, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 696, §11, is
amended to read:
A-1. The parent refused for 6 months to comply with treatment required in a
reunification plan with regard to the child for reasons other than poverty.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §4002, sub-§6, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. B, §178, is
amended to read:
6. Jeopardy to health or welfare or jeopardy. "Jeopardy to health or welfare" or
"jeopardy" means serious abuse or neglect, for reasons other than poverty, as evidenced
by:
A. Serious harm or threat of serious harm;
B. Deprivation Willful deprivation of adequate food, clothing, shelter, supervision or
care for reasons other than poverty;
B-1. Deprivation Willful deprivation of necessary health care when the deprivation
places the child in danger of serious harm for reasons other than poverty;
B-2. Truancy under Title 20‑A, section 3272, subsection 2, paragraph C or section
5051‑A, subsection 1, paragraph C or D;
C. Abandonment of the child or absence of any person responsible for the child, which
creates a threat of serious harm; or
D. The end of voluntary placement, when the imminent return of the child to the child's
custodian causes a threat of serious harm.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §4002, sub-§10, as amended by PL 1985, c. 739, §3, is further
amended to read:
10. Serious harm. "Serious harm" means:
A. Serious, nonaccidental injury;
B. Serious mental or emotional injury or impairment which now or in the future that
is likely to be evidenced by serious mental, behavioral or personality disorder,
including severe anxiety, depression or withdrawal, untoward aggressive behavior,
Page 1 - 132LR2185(01)

411 seriously delayed development or similar serious dysfunctional behavior, as diagnosed
422 by a qualified medical provider, and that is the direct result of abuse or willful neglect
433 for reasons other than poverty; or
C. Sexual abuse or exploitation.
Sec. 5. 22 MRSA §4034, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2015, c. 501, §9, is further
amended to read:
1. Request. A petitioner may add to a child protection petition a request for a
preliminary protection order or may request a preliminary protection order separately from
the child protection petition. A request for a preliminary protection order must include a
sworn summary of facts to support the request and identify the specific services offered
and provided under section 4036‑B, subsection 3 to prevent the removal of the child from
the home, including the specific efforts made, the duration of those efforts and the outcome
of those efforts.
Sec. 6. 22 MRSA §4036-B, sub-§3, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 408, §1, is
amended to read:
A. Whether or not the department has made reasonable efforts to prevent the removal
of the child from home, including the specific efforts made, the duration of those efforts
and the outcome of those efforts; and